Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB592.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Office for Individuals with Disabilities Act.Section 102. Legislative policy and declaration.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) An individual with disability and the individual's family and guardians should have access to a full range of services and programs, including equal access to all services and programs provided for those without disabilities, as well as individualized and specialized services that meet the unique needs of individuals without discrimination.(2) An individual with disability and the individual's family and guardians are often underserved. They have often been denied access to individualized and specialized services available to the community at large and have been denied services necessary to their health, well-being, independence and advancement.(3) An individual with disability who could live and work in the community may live in an institution at State expense due to inadequate funding for community support services. The result is a loss both to the individual with disability and to this Commonwealth.(4) An individual with disability and the individual's 20250SB0592PN0600 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family and guardians should have the opportunity to choose and direct the services and programs provided to them, and the community of individuals with disabilities should direct the development and operation of the delivery system.(5) Increased availability of community support services and programs will enable individuals with disabilities and the individuals' family and guardians to be more independent and productive, to remain in their homes and communities and to more fully exercise their rights and responsibilities as citizens.(6) Services and programs provided by the Commonwealth to individuals with disabilities and the individuals' family and guardians should be provided in a manner that promotes independent living, enables individuals to obtain and maintain employment and supports individuals in their homes and communities.(7) A State-level office and advisory committee is needed to advise and assist the Governor and the General Assembly in developing policies addressing the concerns of individuals with disabilities and the individuals' family and guardians.(8) Access to the office will enable individuals with disabilities and the individuals' family and guardians to have their concerns and issues addressed.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Advisory Committee for Individuals with Disabilities established under this act.20250SB0592PN0600 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Consumer control." The right of an individual with disability or an individual acting on behalf of an individual with disability to maintain power and authority over decisions affecting the provision of services, programs and community activities."Disability services." Services and programs provided to individuals with disabilities or the individuals' family or guardians to enhance the ability of individuals with disabilities to live or work independently and to pursue their rights and responsibilities as citizens."Functional limitation." A limitation that affects one or more of the following activities of daily living:(1) Mobility.(2) Communication.(3) Self-care.(4) Work.(5) Recreation.(6) Independent living.(7) Learning.(8) Self-direction."Individual with disability." A child or adult who has a severe chronic condition resulting in substantial functional limitation that is attributable to psychological, cognitive, developmental, physical or sensory impairment or a combination of psychological, cognitive, developmental, physical or sensory impairment and is likely to continue long term."Long term." Likely to be of extended or lifelong duration."Office." The Office for Individuals with Disabilities established under this act.CHAPTER 320250SB0592PN0600 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OFFICE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIESSection 301. Establishment.The Office for Individuals with Disabilities is established within the Office of the Governor. The office shall be administered by the Office of the Governor.Section 302. Powers and duties of office.(a) Duties.--The office shall have all of the following powers and duties:(1) Ensure that an individual with disability in this Commonwealth and the individual's family and guardians have access to adequate and coordinated quality services and programs.(2) Establish interagency agreements and working relationships with other governmental bodies and public and private agencies to:(i) Ensure access to the full range of available services and programs for an individual with disability and the individual's family and guardians.(ii) Advocate for consumer control.(iii) Coordinate the delivery of nonduplicative disability services and programs to an individual with disability and the individual's family and guardians.(3) Identify gaps in disability services and programs and funding shortages in collaboration with the committee and report the findings annually to the Governor and the General Assembly.(4) Act as a system advocate to expand the availability of disability services and programs and access to generic services and programs.(5) Plan for Statewide improvements in services and 20250SB0592PN0600 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 programs for an individual with disability and the individual's family and guardians.(6) Develop and enforce, within one year of the effective date of this section, regulations necessary and appropriate to satisfy the duties imposed under this act. Development of program requirements and regulations shall be accomplished in collaboration with the committee.(7) Employ an executive director to carry out the duties of this section.(b) (Reserved).Section 303. Power to contract.The office may contract with Statewide disability-related organizations to carry out the provisions of this act. The contracts must place contract activities under the direction and control of individuals with disabilities.CHAPTER 5ADVISORY COMMITTEE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIESSection 501. Establishment.The Advisory Committee for Individuals with Disabilities is established within the office and shall serve in an advisory capacity to the office in matters regarding individuals with disabilities in this Commonwealth. The committee shall be administered by the office.Section 502. Membership.(a) Public official members.--The committee shall consist of the following members, who shall serve by virtue of their public position:(1) Adjutant General.(2) Secretary of Aging.(3) Secretary of the Budget.20250SB0592PN0600 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Secretary of the Commonwealth.(5) Secretary of Education.(6) Secretary of Health.(7) Secretary of Human Services.(8) Secretary of Labor and Industry.(9) Secretary of Policy and Planning.(10) Secretary of Transportation.(11) Director of the Office of Health Care Reform.(12) Chairperson of the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission.(13) Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency.(14) Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Developmental Disabilities Planning Council.(15) Executive Director of the Office for Individuals with Disabilities.(16) Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Long-Term Care Council.(b) Nongovernmental members.--The committee shall consist of nongovernmental members to be appointed by the Governor as follows:(1) The Governor shall appoint individuals with disabilities, including individuals from existing stakeholder groups, in such number as the Governor deems appropriate.(2) At a minimum, 60% of nongovernmental members shall be individuals with disabilities or family members of individuals with disabilities.(3) Committee members shall be selected based upon an evaluation of information received through formal application.20250SB0592PN0600 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Voting.--(1) The members appointed under subsection (a) may not vote on matters brought up for consideration by the committee.(2) The members appointed under subsection (b) shall hold voting privileges on all matters brought up for consideration by the committee.(d) Terms.--(1) The term of a member under subsection (a) shall be concurrent with the member's holding of public office.(2) A member appointed under subsection (b) shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor as long as the member represents the interest of the membership class for which the member was appointed and shall serve until the member's successor is appointed.(e) Chairperson.--The Governor shall appoint a nongovernmental member of the committee to serve as chairperson of the committee.(f) Expenses of members.--(1) A member of the committee may not receive compensation for service on the committee.(2) A member of the committee who is not an employee of State government shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the course of official duties as a member and in accordance with 29 U.S.C. Ch. 16 (relating to vocational rehabilitation and other rehabilitation services).Section 503. Powers and duties of committee.(a) Powers and duties.--The committee shall have all of the following powers and duties:(1) Make recommendations to the Governor on policies, 20250SB0592PN0600 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 procedures, regulations and legislation that aid individuals with disabilities in this Commonwealth.(2) Serve as the Governor's liaison to individuals with disabilities on policies, procedures, regulations and legislation that affect individuals with disabilities in order to ensure that State government is accessible, accountable and responsive to individuals with disabilities.(3) Serve as a resource to all departments, commissions and agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction to ensure that government entities are cognizant of the needs of individuals with disabilities and that government entities' respective services and programs are accessible to those individuals.(4) Work with the Governor and the agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction to monitor the hiring, retention and promotion practices of the Commonwealth relating to the employment of individuals with disabilities in order to ensure that there are no discriminatory practices within the Commonwealth.(5) Perform other duties as the Governor may assign in planning for services and programs for individuals with disabilities and the individuals' family and guardians.(b) Studies and reports.--The committee may conduct studies and issue reports upon request and as the committee deems necessary on issues affecting individuals with disabilities in this Commonwealth.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent the committee from establishing ad hoc work groups or local boards to assist in research and other duties necessary to carry out the mission of the office.CHAPTER 720250SB0592PN0600 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 701. Funding.(a) Use of Federal money.--The Office of the Governor shall use Federal money where possible for the administration of the office.(b) Appropriated money.--The committee shall expend Federal money on appropriation by the General Assembly prior to expending any State appropriations for the same or similar purpose.(c) Private money.--The Office of the Governor shall utilize any available private money to carry out the provisions of this act.Section 702. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0592PN0600 - 10 - 1234567891011121314